de: Dudelsackzubehör inklusive: Sacküberzug; Spielpfeifen-Kappe/Überzug; Reinigungsset; Bordunschnüre; Hartschalenkoffer; Anleitungsbuch; Feuchtigkeitskontrollsystem; Übungsspielpfeife; Softcase/Tasche; Sonstige
es: Accesorios de la gaita incluidos: Funda para el saco; Funda/boquillero del puntero; Kit de limpieza; Cuerdas del bordón; Estuche rígido; Libro de instrucciones; Sistema de control de humedad; Puntero de práctica; Estuche blando/funda; Otro
zh-TW: 包含風笛配件: 風袋套; 旋律管套/蓋; 清潔工具包; 伴管繩索; 硬盒; 說明書; 濕度控制系統; 練習用旋律管; 軟盒/袋; 其他
ja: バグパイプアクセサリー付き: バッグカバー; チャンターカバー/キャップ; クリーニングキット; ドローンコード; ハードケース; 教則本; モイスチャーコントロールシステム; プラクティスチャンター; ソフトケース/バッグ; その他
hu: Skót duda kiegészítők: Dudazsák huzat; Dallamsípvédő kupak; Tisztítókészlet; Burdon zsinórok; Keménytok; Oktatókönyv; Páraszabályozó rendszer; Gyakorlósíp; Puhatok/táska; Egyéb
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับปี่สกอตที่รวมอยู่ด้วย: ที่หุ้มถุงลม; ที่หุ้ม/ฝาปิดแชนเทอร์; ชุดทำความสะอาด; เชือกรัดโดรน; เคสแข็ง; หนังสือคู่มือ; ระบบควบคุมความชื้น; แชนเทอร์สำหรับฝึกซ้อม; เคสอ่อน/กระเป๋า; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Priloženi dodatki za dude: Prevleka za meh; Prevleka/pokrovček za piščal (chanter); Komplet za čiščenje; Vrvice za brdone; Trdi kovček; Knjiga z navodili; Sistem za nadzor vlage; Vadbeni chanter; Mehki kovček/torba; Drugo
nl: Doedelzakaccessoires inbegrepen: Doedelzakhoes; Chanter-hoes/dop; Schoonmaakset; Drone-koorden; Harde koffer; Instructieboek; Vochtregulatiesysteem; Oefenchanter; Zachte koffer/tas; Overig
da: Sækkepibetilbehør medfølger: Sækovertræk; Spillepibehætte; Rengøringssæt; Bordunsnore; Hardcase; Instruktionsbog; Fugtkontrolsystem; Øvepibe; Softcase/taske; Andet
sv: Säckpipetillbehör som ingår: Säcköverdrag; Spelpipsskydd/lock; Rengöringskit; Bordunsnören; Hårt fodral; Instruktionsbok; Fuktkontrollsystem; Övningspipa; Mjukt fodral/väska; Övrigt
fr: Accessoires pour cornemuse inclus: Housse de poche; Protection/capuchon de chanter; Kit de nettoyage; Cordons de bourdon; Étui rigide; Manuel d’instructions; Système de contrôle d’humidité; Chanter d’entraînement; Étui souple/housse; Autre
nb: Medfølgende sekkepipe-tilbehør: Sekkovertrekk; Hette for melodipipe; Rengjøringssett; Dronesnorer; Hardt etui; Instruksjonsbok; Fuktighetskontrollsystem; Øvingschanter; Mykt etui/veske; Annet
ru: Аксессуары для волынки в комплекте: Чехол для мешка; Колпачок/чехол для чантера; Набор для чистки; Шнуры для бурдонов; Жесткий футляр; Инструкция; Система контроля влажности; Тренировочный чантер; Мягкий чехол/сумка; Другое
pl: Dołączono akcesoria do dud: Pokrowiec na worek; Osłona/Zatyczka do piszczałki; Zestaw do czyszczenia; Sznury do burdonów; Twardy futerał; Książka instruktażowa; System kontroli wilgoci; Piszczałka ćwiczebna; Miękki futerał/torba; Inne
vi: Phụ kiện kèn túi đi kèm: Vỏ bọc túi; Vỏ/nắp đậy ống chanter; Bộ dụng cụ vệ sinh; Dây buộc ống drone; Hộp cứng; Sách hướng dẫn; Hệ thống kiểm soát độ ẩm; Ống chanter tập luyện; Hộp mềm/túi; Khác
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za gajde: Navlaka za mješinu; Poklopac za prebiraljku; Komplet za čišćenje; Uzice za trubnjeve; Tvrdi kovčeg; Knjiga s uputama; Sustav za kontrolu vlage; Prebiraljka za vježbu; Meki kovčeg / torba; Ostalo
cs: Obsažené příslušenství k dudám: Obal na měch; Kryt/klobouček melodické píšťaly; Čisticí sada; Šňůry na bordunové píšťaly; Pevné pouzdro; Učebnice; Systém kontroly vlhkosti; Cvičný chanter; Měkké pouzdro / taška; Jiné
en: Bagpipe accessories included: Bag cover; Chanter cover/cap; Cleaning kit; Drone cords; Hard case; Instruction book; Moisture control system; Practice chanter; Soft case/bag; Other
pt-PT: Acessórios para gaita de foles incluídos: Capa do saco; Capa/tampa do ponteiro; Kit de limpeza; Cordões do roncão; Estojo rígido; Livro de instruções; Sistema de controlo de humidade; Ponteiro de prática; Estojo flexível/saco; Outro
fi: Mukana tulevat säkkipillitarvikkeet: Pussin suojus; Melodiapillin suojus/tulppa; Puhdistuspakkaus; Bordunapillin nyörit; Kova kotelo; Ohjekirja; Kosteudenhallintajärjestelmä; Harjoitusmelodiapilli; Pehmeä kotelo / kassi; Muu
sk-SK: Vrátane príslušenstva ku gajdám: Poťah na vak; Kryt/klobúčik na predničku (chanter); Čistiaca súprava; Šnúry na huky; Pevné puzdro; Kniha s pokynmi; Systém kontroly vlhkosti; Cvičná prednička (chanter); Mäkké puzdro/taška; Iné
it: Accessori per cornamusa inclusi: Cover per sacca; Cover/cappuccio per chanter; Kit di pulizia; Corde per bordoni; Custodia rigida; Libretto di istruzioni; Sistema di controllo dell’umidità; Chanter da studio; Custodia morbida/borsa; Altro
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за гайда: Калъф за мех; Калъф/капачка за гайдуница; Комплект за почистване; Шнурове за ручило; Твърд калъф; Книга с инструкции; Система за контрол на влагата; Тренировъчна гайдуница; Мек калъф/чанта; Друго
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys dūdmaišio priedai: Maišo užvalkalas; Melodinio vamzdelio dangtelis; Valymo rinkinys; Burdono virvelės; Kietas dėklas; Instrukcijų knygelė; Drėgmės kontrolės sistema; Mokomasis melodinis vamzdelis; Minkštas dėklas / krepšys; Kita
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα αξεσουάρ γκάιντας: Κάλυμμα ασκού; Κάλυμμα/καπάκι αυλού; Κιτ καθαρισμού; Κορδόνια ισοκράτη (drone); Σκληρή θήκη; Βιβλίο οδηγιών; Σύστημα ελέγχου υγρασίας; Αυλός εξάσκησης; Μαλακή θήκη/τσάντα; Άλλο
ro-RO: Accesorii pentru cimpoi incluse: Husă pentru cimpoi; Capac/Husă pentru chanter (cântător); Kit de curățare; Cordoane pentru bordun; Toc rigid; Manual de instrucțiuni; Sistem de control al umidității; Chanter pentru repetiții; Geantă/Toc moale; Altele
tr: Dahil olan gayda aksesuarları: Tulum kılıfı; Chanter kılıfı/kapağı; Temizleme kiti; Dem ses borusu kordonları; Sert kılıf; Eğitim kitabı; Nem kontrol sistemi; Egzersiz chanter'ı; Yumuşak kılıf/çanta; Diğer
ko: 백파이프 액세서리 포함: 백 커버; 챈터 커버/캡; 클리닝 키트; 드론 코드; 하드 케이스; 설명서; 수분 조절 시스템; 연습용 챈터; 소프트 케이스/가방; 기타
zh-CN: 包括风笛配件: 风笛袋套; 旋律管套/帽; 清洁套装; 和弦管挂绳; 硬盒; 说明书; 湿度控制系统; 练习用旋律管; 软盒/软包; 其他
pt-BR: Acessórios para gaita de foles incluídos: Capa da bolsa; Capa/tampa do ponteiro; Kit de limpeza; Cordões dos bordões; Estojo rígido; Livro de instruções; Sistema de controle de umidade; Ponteiro de prática; Estojo flexível/bolsa; Outro